Nebraska, session 109, LB370.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 48-3601, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3601 Sections 48-3601 to 48-3609 and sections 7 to 10 of this act
shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name,
Image, or Likeness Rights Act.
Sec. 2. Section 48-3602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3602 For purposes of the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Rights Act:
(1) Agency agreement means an agreement or contract between an
athlete agent holding a certificate of registration under the Nebraska
Uniform Athlete Agents Act and a student-athlete for the athlete agent to
represent the student-athlete in the business of such student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness activity;
(2) (1) Athletic grant-in-aid means the money given to a student-
athlete by a postsecondary institution for tuition, fees, room, board,
and textbooks as consideration for the student-athlete's participation in
an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary institution and does not
include compensation for the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness property rights or athletic reputation;
(3) (2) Collegiate athletic association means any athletic
association, conference, or other group or organization with authority
over the governance or rules enforcement of intercollegiate sports;
(4) (3) Compensation for the use of a student-athlete's name, image,
or likeness property rights or athletic reputation includes, but is not
limited to, consideration received in exchange for providing
constitutionally protected speech or pursuant to an endorsement contract
as defined in section 48-2602;
(5) (4) Intercollegiate sport has the same meaning as in section
48-2602;
(6) Name, image, or likeness collective means a group of two or more
-2-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
individuals or entities that collaborate (a) to arrange or enter into a
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation contract
or agreement with a student-athlete at a particular postsecondary
institution or (b) pay compensation for the use of a student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation to a
student-athlete with the stipulation that such student-athlete attends a
particular postsecondary institution;
(7) (5) Name, image, or likeness activity means an activity that
involves the use of an individual's name, image, or likeness for
commercial or promotional purposes;
(8) Parties means legal signatories to an agency agreement that
includes an athlete agent and the legal signatory or signatories of a
student-athlete who the athlete agent will represent;
(9) (6) Postsecondary institution has the same meaning as in section
85-2403;
(10) (7) Professional representation includes, but is not limited
to, representation provided by an athlete agent holding a certificate of
registration under the Nebraska Uniform Athlete Agents Act, a financial
advisor registered under the Securities Act of Nebraska, or an attorney
admitted to the bar by order of the Supreme Court of this state;
(11) (8) Sponsor means an individual or organization that pays money
or provides goods or services in exchange for advertising rights;
(12) (9) Student-athlete has the same meaning as in section 48-2602;
and
(13) (10) Team contract means a contract between a postsecondary
institution or a postsecondary institution's athletic department and a
sponsor; and .
(14) Third party means a person or entity that is not a
postsecondary institution, a conference, or a collegiate athletic
association and that pays compensation for the use of a student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation.
-3-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
Sec. 3. Section 48-3603, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3603 (1) A student-athlete may:
(a) Enter into an agency agreement. A student-athlete shall not be
required to pay any commission or fee to the athlete agent as part of an
agency agreement that is not written and acknowledged as required
pursuant to section 9 of this act. A student-athlete may rescind an
executed agency agreement without penalty within fifteen calendar days
after executing the agreement by sending written notification to the
athlete agent;
(b) Enter into a contract or agreement regarding the student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation
and receive compensation directly from a postsecondary institution, an
athletic program supporter, a name, image, and likeness collective, or a
third party. Any such compensation received under the contract or
agreement shall be for services actually performed. A student-athlete
shall not be paid for a contract or agreement that extends beyond the
student-athlete's participation in an athletic program at a postsecondary
institution. Nothing in the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Rights Act shall require a postsecondary institution, an
athletic program supporter, a name, image, or likeness collective, or a
third party to pay compensation to a student-athlete;
(c) Be prohibited by a postsecondary institution from entering into
a contract or agreement related to the use of the student-athlete's name,
image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation or engaging in
name, image, or likeness activities for products, services, entities, or
activities that the postsecondary institution reasonably deemed to be
inconsistent with the educational mission of the postsecondary
institution; and
(d) Obtain professional representation in relation to a contract or
agreement or other legal matter related to the use of the student-
-4-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation.
(1) No postsecondary institution shall uphold any rule, requirement,
standard, or limitation that prevents a student-athlete from fully
participating in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary
institution because such student-athlete earns or intends to earn
compensation for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness rights or athletic reputation.
(2) No collegiate athletic association shall penalize a student-
athlete or prevent a student-athlete from fully participating in an
intercollegiate sport because such student-athlete earns or intends to
earn compensation for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness rights or athletic reputation.
(3) No collegiate athletic association shall penalize a
postsecondary institution or prevent a postsecondary institution from
fully participating in an intercollegiate sport because a student-athlete
participating in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary
institution earns or intends to earn compensation for the use of such
student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation.
(4) No postsecondary institution shall be prohibited from:
(a) Creating, identifying, facilitating, enabling, or supporting
student-athlete name, image, or likeness activities; or
(b) Entering into agreements with a third-party entity to create,
identify, facilitate, enable, or support name, image, or likeness
activities.
(5) No third-party entity or individual shall be prohibited from:
(a) Communicating with a student-athlete to create, identify,
facilitate, enable, or support name, image, or likeness activities;
(b) Compensating a student-athlete for the use of such student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation; or
(c) Compensating student-athletes for promoting:
-5-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
(i) An athletics event in which the student-athlete may participate,
if the third-party entity or individual has an agreement to promote the
athletics event; or
(ii) The postsecondary institution which the student-athlete
attends.
(6) No postsecondary institution shall allow compensation earned by
a student-athlete for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness rights or athletic reputation to affect the duration, amount, or
eligibility for or renewal of any athletic grant-in-aid or other
institutional scholarship, except that compensation earned by a student-
athlete for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, or likeness
rights or athletic reputation may be used for the calculation of income
for determining eligibility for need-based financial aid.
(7)(a) The compensation a student-athlete earns for the use of the
student-athlete's name, image, or likeness rights or athletic reputation
must be for services actually performed. Student-athletes shall not be
paid for contracts that (i) extend beyond the student-athlete's
participation in an athletic program at a postsecondary institution, (ii)
involve the sale or exchange of awards or other items received for
athletic participation, or (iii) provide compensation for work not
performed.
(b) A postsecondary institution shall not compensate a student-
athlete for the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness
rights or athletic reputation unless otherwise permitted or authorized
by:
(i) A collegiate athletic association and postsecondary institution
policy;
(ii) A court order; or
(iii) A settlement agreement.
(8) Student-athletes may be prohibited from entering into contracts
or agreements related to the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or
-6-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
likeness rights or athletic reputation or engaging in name, image, or
likeness activities for products, services, entities, or activities
reasonably deemed to be inconsistent with the educational mission of the
postsecondary institution by such postsecondary institution.
(9) Nothing in the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness
Rights Act shall limit the ability of a postsecondary institution to
establish and enforce standards, requirements, regulations, or
obligations for such postsecondary institution's students not
inconsistent with the act.
(2) (10) Nothing in the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Rights Act grants to a student-athlete the right to use any
name, trademark, service mark, logo, symbol, or other intellectual
property that belongs to the postsecondary institution, regardless of
whether the intellectual property is registered, to further the student-
athlete's opportunities to earn compensation for the use of the student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation.
(3) (11) Nothing in the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Rights Act shall be construed to qualify a student-athlete as an
employee of a postsecondary institution based solely on the fact that the
student-athlete earns compensation for the use of the student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation, or is
engaged in name, image, or likeness activities pursuant to the act.
Sec. 4. Section 48-3604, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3604 (1) Any student-athlete who enters into a contract or
agreement that provides compensation for the use of such student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation
shall disclose such contract or agreement to an official of the
postsecondary institution for which such student-athlete participates in
an intercollegiate sport. The official to which such contract or
-7-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
agreement shall be disclosed shall be designated by each postsecondary
institution, and the designation shall be communicated in writing to each
student-athlete participating in an intercollegiate sport for such
postsecondary institution. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this
section, or unless otherwise required by law, each postsecondary
institution shall be prohibited from disclosing any information written,
produced, collected, assembled, or maintained by such postsecondary
institution that includes or reveals any term of a contract or agreement
or proposed contract or agreement for the use of a student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation.
(2) If any contract or agreement is entered into by an entity
subject to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09 for the use of a student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation, such contract or agreement shall be considered a public
record subject to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
Sec. 5. Section 48-3605, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3605 (1) No student-athlete shall enter into a contract or
agreement with a sponsor that provides compensation to the student-
athlete for use of the student-athlete's name, image, and likeness
property rights or athletic reputation if (a) such contract or agreement
requires such student-athlete to display such sponsor's apparel or to
otherwise advertise for the sponsor during official team activities and
(b) compliance with such contract or agreement requirement would conflict
with a team contract. Any postsecondary institution asserting such
conflict shall disclose to the student-athlete and the student-athlete's
professional representation, if applicable, the full team contract that
is asserted to be in conflict. The student-athlete and the student-
athlete's professional representation, if applicable, shall be prohibited
from disclosing any terms of a team contract that the postsecondary
institution deems to be a trade secret or otherwise nondisclosable.
-8-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
(2) No team contract shall prevent a student-athlete from receiving
compensation for the use of such student-athlete's name, image, and
likeness property rights or athletic reputation when the student-athlete
is not engaged in official team activities.
Sec. 6. Section 48-3606, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
48-3606 (1) A postsecondary institution may:
(a) Create, identify, facilitate, enable, or support student-athlete
name, image, or likeness activities, but shall not collect a commission
for such assistance;
(b) Enter into contracts or agreements with a third party to create,
identify, facilitate, enable, or support name, image, or likeness
activities;
(c) Offer education and training to student-athletes to aid them in
understanding the opportunities that may become available to them for the
use of their name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation, including education in the areas of networking and
communication, brand-building and management, financial literacy, and
compliance; and
(d) Obtain professional representation in relation to a contract or
agreement or other legal matter related to the use of the student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation.
(2) A postsecondary institution shall not:
(a) Impose or comply with any contract, regulation, standard,
requirement, or rule, including any rule of a collegiate athletic
association, that:
(i) Restricts or prohibits a student-athlete from earning
compensation for name, image, or likeness activities conducted in
compliance with the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness
Rights Act;
-9-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
(ii) Upholds any rule, requirement, standard, or limitation that
prevents a student-athlete from fully participating in an intercollegiate
sport for such postsecondary institution because such student-athlete
earns or intends to earn compensation for the use of such student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation; or
(iii) Restricts or prohibits the institution, an athletic program
supporter, a name, image, or likeness collective, or third party from:
(A) Entering into a contract or agreement with a student-athlete for
compensation for the use of a student-athlete's name, image, or likeness
property rights or athletic reputation;
(B) Paying a student-athlete for the use of the student-athlete's
name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation; or
(C) Stipulating in a contract or agreement for the use of a student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation
that a student-athlete attends a particular institution or be a member of
a particular intercollegiate athletics sports team;
(b) Penalize, threaten, or retaliate against a student-athlete, an
athlete agent, a name, image, or likeness collective, or a third party
for activities authorized by the act;
(c) Comply with any investigation, regulation, or rule of a
collegiate athletic association related to agency agreements, name,
image, or likeness activities, or the compensation for the use of a
student-athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation that conflict with the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image,
or Likeness Rights Act;
(d) Allow compensation earned by a student-athlete for the use of
such student-athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or
athletic reputation to affect the duration, amount, or eligibility for or
renewal of any athletic grant-in-aid or other institutional scholarship,
except that compensation earned by a student-athlete for the use of such
-10-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
student-athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation may be used for the calculation of income for determining
eligibility for need-based financial aid; or
(e) Restrict or prohibit a student-athlete from entering into an
agency agreement.
(3) Nothing in the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness
Rights Act shall limit the ability of a postsecondary institution to
establish and enforce standards, requirements, regulations, or
obligations for such postsecondary institution's student-athlete's not
inconsistent with the act.
(1) No postsecondary institution or collegiate athletic association
shall penalize a student-athlete or prevent a student-athlete from fully
participating in an intercollegiate sport because such student-athlete
obtains professional representation in relation to a contract or legal
matter related to the use of the student-athlete's name, image, or
likeness rights or athletic reputation.
(2) No collegiate athletic association shall penalize a
postsecondary institution or prevent a postsecondary institution from
fully participating in an intercollegiate sport because a student-athlete
participating in an intercollegiate sport for such postsecondary
institution obtains professional representation in relation to a contract
or legal matter related to the use of the student-athlete's name, image,
or likeness rights or athletic reputation.
(3) A postsecondary institution may offer education and training to
student-athletes to aid them in understanding the opportunities that may
become available to them for the use of their name, image, or likeness
rights or athletic reputation, including education in the areas of
networking and communication, brand-building and management, financial
literacy, and compliance.
Sec. 7. A collegiate athletic association shall not:
(1) Authorize, cause, or require a postsecondary institution to take
-11-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
an action prohibited by the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or
Likeness Rights Act;
(2) Accept a complaint, open an investigation, threaten a penalty,
impose a penalty, or take any other adverse action against a student-
athlete, an athlete agent, a postsecondary institution, an athletic
program supporter, a name, image, or likeness collective, or a third
party as a result of activities protected by the act;
(3) Prohibit, restrict, or interfere with the freedom of a student-
athlete, an athlete agent, a postsecondary institution, an athletic
program supporter, a name, image, or likeness collective, or a third
party to engage in activities protected by the act; or
(4) Require a student-athlete, an athlete agent, a postsecondary
institution, an athletic program supporter, a name, image, or likeness
collective, or a third party to report any information about a contract
or agreement for the use of a student-athlete's name, image, or likeness
rights or athletic reputation.
Sec. 8. A name, image, or likeness collective, a postsecondary
institution, or a third party that anticipates payment to a student-
athlete of at least five thousand dollars for the use of such student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation
in a calendar year shall first enter into a written contract or agreement
that includes all of the following:
(1) The legal name, physical address, and phone number of the
individual or entity that is legally responsible for paying the
compensation;
(2) The total amount of all compensation for the use of the student-
athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic reputation
that will be paid to the student-athlete, including monetary payments and
any other benefits;
(3) When and how each payment will be made to the student-athlete;
(4) All obligations and requirements of the student-athlete that
-12-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
must be met in order to receive the compensation for the use of the
student-athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or athletic
reputation;
(5) The beginning and end dates of the contract or agreement;
(6) Any options parties have for revising, extending, or terminating
the contract or agreement; and
(7) Any terms of the contract or agreement that would allow the
name, image, or likeness collective, postsecondary institution, or third
party to not pay the athlete any portion of the compensation for the use
of the student-athlete's name, image, or likeness property rights or
athletic reputation.
Sec. 9. (1) Except as provided in section 48-3604, an agency
agreement is not a public record.
(2) An athlete agent shall not enter into an agency agreement if:
(a) The athlete agent has a pending charge or is listed as a
defendant in a case, excluding divorce, in state or federal civil court
judgments at the time parties execute the agency agreement, or has been
convicted in any state or federal court of:
(i) A felony;
(ii) A misdemeanor that involves physical contact with another
person or another person's property, elements of deception, or gambling
or sports wagering;
(iii) More than one violation of any alcohol or drug statute; or
(iv) More than one violation resulting in a sentence for a
misdemeanor; or
(b) The athlete agent provides payment, including a loan or
recoupable payment, to the student-athlete, or to the athlete's relative,
in exchange for the student-athlete entering into the agency agreement.
(3) An athlete agent shall secure a written acknowledgement from the
student-athlete, prior to execution of an agency agreement, of all of the
following:
-13-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
(a) The athlete agent's written attestation that the agent meets all
requirements and conditions for operating as an athlete agent in the
state at the time the agency agreement is executed by the parties;
(b) The athlete agent's written attestation listing all other
states, if any, in which the agent meets all requirements and conditions
for operating as an athlete agent;
(c) The athlete agent's legal name, current address, and telephone
number;
(d) A schedule of fees or commissions to be charged to and collected
from the student-athlete in the conduct of the athlete agent's business;
and
(e) The signature of the minor student-athlete's parent or legal
guardian, if applicable.
(4) If an athlete agent no longer meets all requirements and
conditions for operating as an athlete agent in this state, the athlete
agent shall notify all student-athlete clients within five calendar days
of such athlete agent no longer meeting such requirement or condition.
(5) An agency agreement shall not establish any requirements or
obligations for the student-athlete's spouse, parent, legal guardian,
sibling, or grandparent in order to assist the student-athlete in
negotiating the agreement.
(6) Any agency agreement which does not meet the requirements of the
Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act is void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 10. A contract or agreement, including an agency agreement,
shall not offer or provide a prospective college athlete, a college
athlete, or an athlete's parent or legal guardian an upfront payment or
benefit in exchange for any future name, image, or likeness property
rights or athletic representation or professional sports earnings. Any
such contract or agreement is void and unenforceable.
Sec. 11. Section 48-3608, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-14-

LB370 LB370
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
48-3608 (1) A student-athlete, or a postsecondary institution, any
nonprofit foundation established to support a postsecondary institution,
or an entity acting on behalf of a postsecondary institution, an athletic
program supporter, a name, image, or likeness collective, or a third
party aggrieved by a violation of the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name,
Image, or Likeness Rights Act may bring a civil action against the
postsecondary institution or collegiate athletic association committing
such violation.
(2) A plaintiff who prevails in an action under the Nebraska
Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act shall be entitled to:
(a) Actual damages;
(b) Such preliminary and other equitable or declaratory relief as
may be appropriate; and
(c) Reasonable attorney's fees and other litigation costs reasonably
incurred.
(3) A public postsecondary institution may be sued upon claims
arising under the Nebraska Student-Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness
Rights Act only to the extent allowed under the State Tort Claims Act,
the State Contract Claims Act, or the State Miscellaneous Claims Act,
except that a civil action for a violation of the Nebraska Student-
Athlete Name, Image, or Likeness Rights Act may only be brought within
one year after the cause of action has accrued.
Sec. 12. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 13. Original sections 48-3601, 48-3602, 48-3603, 48-3604,
48-3605, 48-3606, and 48-3608, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-15-